dev/verb_pardefs.dix
<pardef n="/loossen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>loossen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gelooss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>loossen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léisst</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>loossen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>loosst</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>loossen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léiss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léissen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léisst</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léissen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>louss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>louss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>louss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>loussen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lousst</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>loussen</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>looss</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>loosst</l><r>loossen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lounen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>lounen</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gelount</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>lounen</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>louns</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lount</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lounen</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lount</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lounen</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>loun</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lount</l><r>lounen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lueden__vblex">
  <e><p><l>lueden</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gelueden</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>lueden</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luets</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luet</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lueden</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luet</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lueden</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>luet</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luet</l><r>lueden<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/luewen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>luewen</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gelueft</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>luewen</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luefs</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lueft</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luewen</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lueft</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>luewen</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>luef</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>lueft</l><r>luewen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/léien__vblex">
  <e><p><l>léien</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gelunn</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léien</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>litts</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>litt</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léien</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>litt</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léien</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léi</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>litt</l><r>léien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/léieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>léieren</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>geléiert</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léieren</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiers</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiert</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léieren</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiert</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léieren</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léier</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léiert</l><r>léieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/léinen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>léinen</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>geléint</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léinen</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léins</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léint</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léinen</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léint</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léinen</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>léin</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>léint</l><r>léinen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/maachen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>maachen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gemaach</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>maachen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>méchs</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>mécht</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>maachen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>maacht</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>maachen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>méich</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>méichs</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>méich</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>méichen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>méicht</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>méichen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>mouch</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>mouchs</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>mouch</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>mouchen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>moucht</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>mouchen</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>maach</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>maacht</l><r>maachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/matschreiwen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>matschreiwen</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>matgeschriwwen</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>schreiwen<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>schreifs<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>schreift<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>schreiwen<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>schreift<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>schreiwen<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>schreif<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>schreift<b/>mat</l><r>matschreiwen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/matspillen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>matspillen</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>matgespillt</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>spillen<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>spills<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>spillt<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>spillen<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>spillt<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>spillen<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>spill<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>spillt<b/>mat</l><r>matspillen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
